Massachusetts, session 194th, S227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any emergency
medical technician, as defined by section 1 of chapter 111C of the General Laws, who has been
(i) awarded a paramedic certification from the National Registry of Emergency Medical
Technicians, (ii) awarded an EMT-Paramedic certificate as administered by the department of
public health, (iii) completed no less than 9,000 hours of paramedic field work for any licensed
ambulance service in the commonwealth after receiving said certificates, and has (iv) completed
a National Council Licensure Exam (NCLEX) approved preparation course, shall not be required
to graduate from a Board of Registration in Nursing approved nursing program in the
commonwealth to participate in the NCLEX-RN.
of 2

SECTION 2. Any emergency medical technician, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111C
of the General Laws, who has been (i) awarded an associate of science, bachelor of science, or
master of science in emergency medical services at an accredited college or university, (ii)
awarded a paramedic certification from the National Registry of Emergency Medical
Technicians, (iii) awarded an EMT-Paramedic certificate as administered by the department of
public health, (iv) completed no less than 5,000 hours of paramedic field work for any licensed
ambulance service in the commonwealth after receiving said certificates, and has (v) completed a
National Council Licensure Exam (NCLEX) approved preparation course, shall not be required
to graduate from a Board of Registration in Nursing approved nursing program in the
commonwealth to participate in the NCLEX-RN.
SECTION 3. Any emergency medical technician paramedic shall be required to provide
specific documentation for Good Moral Character (GMC) evaluation as defined in sections 74,
74A, and 76 of chapter 112 of the General Laws to be licensed as a registered nurse in the
commonwealth.
SECTION 4. The department of public health shall develop regulations and guidelines
within 180 days of the passage of this act.
of 2